Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB468.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/20/2024 11:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 147
(1) As used in this section, "Green Star flag" means a flag with a green star
prominently displayed in the center, with a white background and a red border.
(2) The Green Star flag is the Commonwealth's symbol of continued awareness of
military service member and veteran suicide, and the commitment to recognize
and resolve military service member and veteran suicide, remember the lives and
honor the service of those military service members and veterans who have died
by suicide, and honor, respect, and unite their families.
(3) All Green Star flags purchased by a public institution or displayed by a public
institution shall be manufactured in the United States.
(4) The Green Star flag may be displayed wherever there is a flag of the United
States and POW/MIA flag.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/20/2024 11:22 AM Jacketed